Mississippi, session 2026, SB2005.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  The following shall be codified as Section 3-3-79, Mississippi Code of 1972: 3-3-79.  (1) There shall be an official state tartan for the state of Mississippi.  A tartan is a plaid textile design consisting of stripes of varying width and color, producing a repeating pattern.  This plaid is typically used in highland dress, the most common of which is the Scottish Kilt. (2)  The pattern, image included, for the state tartan shall be defined by the repeating design (half-sett) as follows:  twenty (20) Black, forty (40) Green, four (4) Blue, twenty (20) Black, twenty (20) Green, eight (8) Red, twenty (20) Black, twenty (20) Green, one (1) Yellow, one (1) Dark Gold, one (1) Yellow, one (1) Yellow, one (1) Dark Gold, one (1) Yellow, four (4) White. (3)  This pattern is described in the standard Tartan thread count nomenclature, where each letter designates a color and the number is the quantity of threads of that color in the stripe as:  K20 G40 B4 K20 G20 R8 K20 G20 Y1 RY1 Y1 RY1 WW4. (4)  The colors of the tartan shall be: (a)  Black (K) represented by Pantone 6-0000 TCX (Black), with the hexadecimal equivalent #101010; (b)  Green (G) represented by Pantone 19-6050 TCX (Forest Green), with the hexadecimal equivalent #006818; (c)  Blue (B) represented by Pantone 19-4057 TCX (Blue Sapphire), with the hexadecimal equivalent #2C2C80; (d)  Red (R) represented by Pantone 19-1664 TCX (Red), with the hexadecimal equivalent #C80000; (e)  Yellow (Y) represented by Pantone 14-0852 TCX (Spectra Yellow), with the hexadecimal equivalent #E8C000; (f)  Dark Gold (RY) represented by Pantone 15-0956 TCX (Golden Ochre), with the hexadecimal equivalent #BC8C00; and (g)  White (WW) represented by Pantone 11-0602 TCX (Snow White), with the hexadecimal equivalent #F8F8F8. (5)  This tartan shall be known as the Mississippi Tartan and may be freely used by any and all organizations, societies and individuals affiliated with the state of Mississippi. (6)  This tartan is at this time listed in the United Kingdom's Scottish Registry of Tartans:  https://www.tartanregister.gov.uk/tartanDetails?ref=2965. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.